Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1337
Distance education
incentives; application; contents; calculation of incentives; denial of incentives;
appeal.

(1) For fiscal years 2007-08 through 2015-16,
the State Department of Education shall provide distance education incentives
from the Education Innovation Fund to school districts and educational service
units for qualified distance education courses coordinated through the Distance
Education Council until July 1, 2008, and the Educational Service Unit Coordinating
Council on and after July 1, 2008, as provided in this section.

(2) School districts and educational service units shall
apply for incentives annually through
calendar year 2015 to the department on or before August 1 on
a form specified by the department. The application shall:

(a) For school districts, specify (i) the qualified distance
education courses which were received by students in the membership of the
district in the then-current school fiscal year and which were not taught
by a teacher employed by the school district and (ii) for each such course
(A) the number of students in the membership of the district who received
the course, (B) the educational entity employing the teacher, and (C) whether
the course was a two-way interactive video distance education course; and

(b) For school districts and educational service units, specify
(i) the qualified distance education courses which were received by students
in the membership of another educational entity in the then-current school
fiscal year and which were taught by a teacher employed by the school district
or educational service unit, (ii) for each such course for school districts,
the number of students in the membership of the district who received the
course, and (iii) for each such course (A) the other educational entities
in which students received the course and how many students received the course
at such educational entities, (B) any school district that is sparse or very
sparse as such terms are defined in section 79-1003 that had at least one
student in the membership who received the course, and (C) whether the course
was a two-way interactive video distance education course.

(3) On or before September 1 of each year through calendar year 2015, the department
shall certify the incentives for each school district and educational service
unit which shall be paid on or before October 1 of such year. The incentives
for each district shall be calculated as follows:

(a) Each district shall receive distance education units
for each qualified distance education course as follows:

(i) One distance education unit for each qualified distance
education course received as reported pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this
section if the course was a two-way interactive video distance education course;

(ii) One distance education unit for each qualified distance
education course sent as reported pursuant to subdivision (2)(b) of this section
if the course was not received by at least one student who was in the membership
of another school district which was sparse or very sparse;

(iii) One distance education unit for each qualified distance
education course sent as reported pursuant to subdivision (2)(b) of this section
if the course was received by at least one student who was in the membership
of another school district which was sparse or very sparse, but the course
was not a two-way interactive video distance education course; and

(iv) Two distance education units for each qualified distance
education course sent as reported pursuant to subdivision (2)(b) of this section
if the course was received by at least one student who was in the membership
of another school district which was sparse or very sparse and the course
was a two-way interactive video distance education course;

(b) The difference of the amount available for distribution
in the Education Innovation Fund on the August 1 when the applications were
due minus any amount to be paid to school districts pursuant to section 79-1336
shall be divided by the number of distance education units to determine the
incentive per distance education unit, except that the incentive per distance
education unit shall not equal an amount greater than one thousand dollars;
and

(c) The incentives for each school district shall equal the
number of distance education units calculated for the school district multiplied
by the incentive per distance education unit.

(4) If there are additional funds available for distribution
after equipment reimbursements pursuant to section 79-1336 and incentives
calculated pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this section, school
districts and educational service units may qualify for additional incentives
for elementary distance education courses. Such incentives shall be calculated
for sending and receiving school districts and educational service units as
follows:

(a) The per-hour incentives shall equal the funds available
for distribution after equipment reimbursements pursuant to section 79-1336
and incentives calculated pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this
section divided by the sum of the hours of elementary distance education courses
sent or received for each school district and educational service unit submitting
an application, except that the per-hour incentives shall not be greater than
ten dollars; and

(b) The elementary distance education incentives for each
school district and educational service unit shall equal the per-hour incentive
multiplied by the hours of elementary distance education courses sent or received
by the school district or educational service unit.

(5) The department may verify any or all application information
using annual curriculum reports and may request such verification from the
council.

(6) On or before October 1 of each year through calendar year 2015, a school district
or educational service unit may appeal the denial of incentives for any course
by the department to the State Board of Education. The board shall allow a
representative of the school district or educational service unit an opportunity
to present information concerning the appeal to the board at the November
board meeting. If the board finds that the course meets the requirements of
this section, the department shall pay the district from the Education Innovation
Fund as soon as practical in an amount for which the district or educational
service unit should have qualified based on the incentive per distance education
unit used in the original certification of incentives pursuant to this section.

(7) The State Board of Education shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2006, LB 1208, § 23;

Laws 2007, LB603, § 30;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 53;

Laws 2014, LB967, § 23.